Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.140

Violation of temporary cease and desist order—Director's application for injunction.

In the case of a violation or threatened violation of a temporary cease and desist order issued under RCW 31.45.120, the director may apply to the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the licensee for an injunction.

[ 1994 c 92 s 286; 1991 c 355 s 14.]